District of Columbia statutes.
47-1812.04

Duty of Mayor to make return.

If any person fails to make and file a return at the time prescribed by law or by regulations made under authority of law, or makes, willfully or otherwise, a false or fraudulent return, the Mayor shall make the return from his own knowledge and from such information as he can obtain through testimony or otherwise. Any return so made and subscribed by the Mayor shall be prima facie good and sufficient for all legal purposes.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 352, ch. 258, art. I, title XII, § 4
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-158, § 4, 25 DCR 7002
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1812.4.
1973 Ed., § 47-1586c.